Vermont, session 2025-2026, H771.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9435 is amended to read:
§ 9435. EXCLUSIONS
* * *
(m) Excluded from this subchapter are ambulatory surgical centers that are
licensed pursuant to chapter 49 of this title or are proposed to be established
and licensed pursuant to chapter 49 of this title.
VT LEG #386155 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.771
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage, and any application for a certificate of
need for an ambulatory surgical center that is already in process on the date of
passage of this act may be withdrawn by the applicant in accordance with
Board rules.
VT LEG #386155 v.1